Colorado, session 2026A, HB1393.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 24-33.5-1207.7
as follows:
24-33.5-1207.7. Public school construction and inspection cash
fund - created - limit on uncommitted reserves - definitions.
(1) THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION AND INSPECTION CASH FUND
IS CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY. All moneys MONEY collected by the
division pursuant to sections 22-32-124 (2), and 23-71-122 (1)(v), C.R.S.,
or section AND 24-33.5-1213.3 shall be transmitted to the state treasurer,
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

who shall credit the same to the public school construction and inspection
cash fund, which is hereby created FUND. All moneys MONEY credited to the
fund and all interest earned thereon ON THE MONEY IN THE FUND are subject
to annual appropriation by the general assembly for paying the expenses of
the public school construction and inspection program. Any unexpended
and unencumbered moneys MONEY remaining in the fund at the end of a
fiscal year shall remain REMAINS in the fund and shall not be credited or
transferred to the general fund or another fund.
(2) (a) THE FUND IS EXCLUDED FROM THE LIMITATIONS SPECIFIED IN
SECTION 24-75-402.
(b) IF, FOR EACH OF THREE CONSECUTIVE FISCAL YEARS, THE
UNCOMMITTED RESERVES OF THE FUND AT THE CONCLUSION OF A FISCAL
YEAR EXCEED THE MAXIMUM RESERVE FOR THAT FISCAL YEAR, THE DIVISION
SHALL REDUCE THE AMOUNT OF ONE OR MORE OF THE FEES CREDITED TO THE
FUND TO AN AMOUNT CALCULATED TO RESULT IN AN AMOUNT OF
UNCOMMITTED RESERVES OF THE FUND FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR THAT
DOES NOT EXCEED THE MAXIMUM RESERVE. IF THE DIVISION REDUCES THE
AMOUNT OF A FEE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE DIVISION MAY
SUBSEQUENTLY RAISE THE AMOUNT OF THE FEE SO LONG AS DOING SO
WOULD NOT CAUSE THE PROJECTED AMOUNT OF UNCOMMITTED RESERVES
OF THE FUND TO EXCEED THE MAXIMUM RESERVE.
(3) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "FUND" MEANS THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION AND
INSPECTION CASH FUND CREATED IN THIS SECTION.
(b) "MAXIMUM RESERVE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
24-75-402 (2).
(c) "UNCOMMITTED RESERVES" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 24-75-402 (2).
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 24-33.5-1207.8
as follows:
24-33.5-1207.8. Health facility construction and inspection cash
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1393

fund - created - limit on uncommitted reserves - definitions.
(1) THE HEALTH FACILITY CONSTRUCTION AND INSPECTION CASH
FUND IS CREATED IN THE STATE TREASURY. All moneys MONEY collected by
the division pursuant to section 24-33.5-1212.5 shall be transmitted to the
state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the health facility construction
and inspection cash fund, which is hereby created FUND. All moneys MONEY
credited to the fund and all interest earned thereon ON THE MONEY IN THE
FUND are subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for paying
the expenses of the health facility construction and inspection program. Any
unexpended and unencumbered moneys MONEY remaining in the fund at the
end of a fiscal year shall remain REMAINS in the fund and shall not be
credited or transferred to the general fund or another fund.
(2) (a) THE FUND IS EXCLUDED FROM THE LIMITATIONS SPECIFIED IN
SECTION 24-75-402.
(b) IF, FOR EACH OF THREE CONSECUTIVE FISCAL YEARS, THE
UNCOMMITTED RESERVES OF THE FUND AT THE CONCLUSION OF A FISCAL
YEAR EXCEED THE MAXIMUM RESERVE FOR THAT FISCAL YEAR, THE DIVISION
SHALL BY RULE OR AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED BY LAW REDUCE THE AMOUNT
OF THE FEE CHARGED BY THE DIVISION PURSUANT TO SECTION
24-33.5-1212.5 TO AN AMOUNT CALCULATED TO RESULT IN AN AMOUNT OF
UNCOMMITTED RESERVES OF THE FUND FOR THE CURRENT FISCAL YEAR THAT
DOES NOT EXCEED THE MAXIMUM RESERVE. IF THE DIVISION REDUCES THE
AMOUNT OF THE FEE PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION, THE DIVISION MAY
SUBSEQUENTLY RAISE THE AMOUNT OF THE FEE SO LONG AS DOING SO
WOULD NOT CAUSE THE PROJECTED AMOUNT OF UNCOMMITTED RESERVES
OF THE FUND TO EXCEED THE MAXIMUM RESERVE.
(3) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(a) "FUND" MEANS THE HEALTH FACILITY CONSTRUCTION AND
INSPECTION CASH FUND CREATED IN THIS SECTION.
(b) "MAXIMUM RESERVE" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
24-75-402 (2).
(c) "UNCOMMITTED RESERVES" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1393

SECTION 24-75-402 (2).
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-75-402, amend
(5)(mmm); and add (5)(ooo) and (5)(ppp) as follows:
24-75-402. Cash funds - limit on uncommitted reserves -
reduction in the amount of fees - exclusions - definitions.
(5) Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, the
following cash funds are excluded from the limitations specified in this
section:
(mmm) The reentry services for justice-involved individuals
reinvestment cash fund created in section 25.5-4-505.7; and
(ooo) THE PUBLIC SCHOOL CONSTRUCTION AND INSPECTION CASH
FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-33.5-1207.7; AND
(ppp) THE HEALTH FACILITY CONSTRUCTION AND INSPECTION CASH
FUND CREATED IN SECTION 24-33.5-1207.8.
SECTION 4. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1393

the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1393